California statutes. Insurance Code
-------------------------------------------

1885.

In marine insurance, a person who has an interest in the thing from which profits are expected to proceed, has an insurable interest in the profits.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1886.

The charterer of a ship has an insurable interest in it, to the extent that he is liable to be damaged by its loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Concealment and Representations—Rules Peculiar to Marine Insurance [1900. - 1905.]

1900.

In marine insurance each party is bound to communicate, in addition to what is required in the case of other insurance:

(a) All the information which he possesses and which is material to the risk, except such as is exempt from such communication in the case of other insurance. 

(b) The exact and whole truth in relation to all matters that he represents or, upon inquiry assumes to disclose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1901.

In marine insurance, information of the belief or expectation of a third person in reference to a material fact, is material.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1902.

A person insured by a contract of marine insurance is presumed to have, at the time of insuring, knowledge of a prior loss, if the information might possibly have reached him in the usual mode of transmission and at the usual rate of communication.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1903.

In marine insurance, concealment in respect to any of the following matters does not vitiate the entire contract, but merely exonerates the insurer from a loss resulting from the risk concealed:

(a) The national character of the insured.

(b) The liability of the subject matter to capture and detention.

(c) The liability to seizure from breach of foreign laws of trade.

(d) The want of necessary documents.

(e) The use of false and simulated papers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 462.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1904.

In marine insurance, if a representation by the insured is intentionally false in any respect, whether material or immaterial, the insurer may rescind the entire contract.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1905.

The failure of subsequent circumstances to conform to a representation as to expectation does not, in the absence of fraud, avoid marine insurance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Implied Warranties Peculiar to Marine Insurance [1920. - 1927.]

1920.

In every marine insurance upon a ship or involving transportation by ship, a warranty is implied that the ship is seaworthy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1921.

A ship is seaworthy when reasonably fit to perform the services and encounter the ordinary perils of the voyage contemplated by the parties to the policy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1922.

An implied warranty of seaworthiness is complied with if the ship is seaworthy at the time of the commencement of the risk, except in the following cases:

(a) When the insurance is made for a specified length of time, the implied warranty is not complied with unless the ship is seaworthy at the commencement of every voyage it undertakes during that time.

(b) When the insurance is upon the cargo and, by the terms of the policy, description of the voyage, or established custom of the trade, the cargo is to be transshipped at an intermediate port, the implied warranty is not complied with unless each vessel upon which the cargo is shipped or transshipped is seaworthy at the commencement of its particular voyage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1923.

A warranty of seaworthiness extends not only to the condition of the structure of the ship itself, but also requires that it be properly laden and provided with:

(a) A competent master.

(b) A sufficient number of competent officers and seamen.

(c) The requisite appurtenances and equipments.

(d) Other necessary or proper stores and implements for the voyage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1924.

Where any portion of the voyage contemplated by a policy differs from other portions in respect to the things requisite to make the ship seaworthy therefor, a warranty of seaworthiness is complied with if, at the commencement of each portion, the ship is seaworthy with reference to that portion.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1925.

When a ship becomes unseaworthy during the voyage, an unreasonable delay in repairing the defect exonerates the insurer from liability on any loss arising from the defect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1926.

A ship may be seaworthy for the purpose of insurance upon itself and, at the same time, unseaworthy for the purpose of insurance upon the cargo because of unfitness to receive the cargo.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1927.

Where the nationality or neutrality of a ship or cargo is expressly warranted, it is implied that:

(a) The ship will carry the requisite documents to show such nationality or neutrality.

(b) It will not carry any documents which cast reasonable suspicion thereon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Effect of Course of Voyage [1940. - 1945.]

1940.

When the voyage contemplated by marine insurance is described by the places of beginning and ending, the voyage insured is one which conforms to the course of sailing fixed by mercantile usage between those places.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1941.

If the course of sailing is not fixed by mercantile usage, the voyage insured by marine insurance is that way between the places specified which, to a master of ordinary skill and discretion, would seem the most natural, direct, and advantageous.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1942.

Deviation is:

(a) A departure from the course of the voyage insured.

(b) An unreasonable delay in pursuing the voyage.

(c) The commencement of an entirely different voyage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1943.

A deviation is proper:

(a) When caused by circumstances over which neither the master nor the owner of the ship has any control.

(b) When necessary to comply with a warranty, or to avoid a peril, whether or not the peril is insured against.

(c) When made in good faith and upon reasonable grounds of belief in its necessity to avoid a peril.

(d) When made in good faith, for the purpose of saving human life or relieving another vessel in distress.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1944.

Every deviation not specified in the last section is improper.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1945.

An insurer is not liable for any loss happening to the subject matter of marine insurance after an improper deviation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Loss in Marine Insurance [1960. - 1997.]

1960.

A loss is either total or partial.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1961.

A total loss is either actual or constructive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1962.

An actual total loss is caused by:

(a) A total destruction of the subject matter of insurance.

(b) The loss of the subject matter by sinking, or by being broken up.

(c) Any damage to the subject matter which renders it valueless to the owner for the purposes for which he held it.

(d) Any other event which entirely deprives the owner of the possession, at the port of destination, of the subject matter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1963.

A constructive total loss is one which gives to a person insured a right to abandon, under section 1971.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1964.

An actual loss may be presumed from the continued absence of a ship without being heard of. The length of time which is sufficient to raise this presumption depends on the circumstances of the case.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1965.

When a ship is prevented, at an intermediate port and by the perils insured against, from completing the voyage, the master shall make every exertion to procure, in the same or a contiguous port, another ship for the purpose of conveying the cargo to its destination. The liability of a marine insurer on the cargo continues after it is thus reshipped and such insurer is additionally liable as prescribed in section 1966.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1966.

In addition to the liability mentioned in section 1965, a marine insurer is liable, up to the amount insured, for damages, expenses of discharging, storage, reshipment, extra freightage, and all other expenses incurred in saving cargo reshipped pursuant to section 1965.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1967.

Upon an actual total loss, the insured is entitled to payment without notice of abandonment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1968.

Where it has been agreed that an insurance upon a particular subject matter, or class of subject matter, is to be free from particular average, a marine insurer is not liable for any particular average loss not depriving the insured of the possession, at the port of destination of the whole of such subject matter or class, even though the subject matter or class becomes entirely worthless; but such insurer is liable for his proportion of all general average loss assessed upon the subject matter insured.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1969.

When insurance is confined in its terms to an actual total loss, it does not cover a constructive total loss, but it does cover any loss which necessarily results in depriving the insured of the possession, at the port of destination, of the entire subject matter insured.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1970.

Abandonment, in marine insurance, is the act of the insured by which, after a constructive total loss, he declares the relinquishment to the insurer of the insured’s interest in the subject matter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1971.

In marine insurance, after abandonment of the subject matter of insurance or of any particular portion thereof which is separately valued by the policy or otherwise separately insured, in a case where the cause of the loss is a peril insured against the insured may recover for a total loss, as described in section 1963, if:

(a) More than half in value of the subject matter is actually lost by such peril, or would have to be expended to recover it from the peril.

(b) The subject matter is injured to such an extent as to reduce its value more than
 half.

(c) The subject matter is a ship, and either the contemplated voyage can not be lawfully performed without incurring either an expense to the insured of more than half the value of the ship abandoned or a risk which a prudent man would not take under the circumstances.

(d) The subject matter is cargo or freightage and the voyage can not be performed, nor another ship procured by the master to forward the cargo, within a reasonable time, with reasonable diligence and without incurring an expense to the insured of more than half the value of the subject matter or a risk which a prudent man would not take under the circumstances. But freightage can not in any case be abandoned unless the ship also is abandoned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1972.

An abandonment can not be either partial or conditional.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1973.

An abandonment can be made only at a time limited by all of the following:

(a) Within a reasonable time after the information of the loss.

(b) After the commencement of the voyage.

(c) Before the insured has information of the completion of the voyage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1974.

Where the information upon which an abandonment has been made proves incorrect, or the subject matter of insurance is so far restored when the abandonment is made that there is in fact no total loss, the abandonment is not effective.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1975.

Abandonment is made by giving oral or written notice thereof to the insurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1976.

A notice of abandonment shall be explicit, and shall specify the particular cause of the abandonment, but need state only enough to show that there is probable cause therefor, and need not be accompanied with proof of interest or of loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1977.

An abandonment can be sustained only upon the cause specified in the notice thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1978.

An abandonment is equivalent to a transfer to the insurer of the insured’s interest, with all the chances of recovery and indemnity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1979.

Whenever a marine insurer pays for a loss as if it were an actual total loss, he is entitled to whatever remains of the subject matter insured, or its proceeds or salvage, to the same extent as in the case of a formal abandonment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1980.

Upon an abandonment, acts done subsequent to the loss and in good faith by persons who at the time were the insured’s agents in respect to the subject matter insured, are at the risk of the insurer, and for his benefit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1981.

An acceptance of an abandonment is not necessary to the rights of the insured, and is not to be presumed from the mere silence of the insurer at the time of receiving notice of abandonment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1982.

The acceptance of an abandonment, whether express or implied, is conclusive upon the parties and admits the loss and the sufficiency of the abandonment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1983.

An abandonment once made and accepted is irrevocable, unless the ground upon which it was made proves to be unfounded.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1984.

On an accepted abandonment of a ship, freightage earned previous to the loss belongs to the insurer of the freightage; but freightage subsequently earned belongs to the insurer of the ship.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1985.

If an insurer refuses to accept a valid abandonment, he is liable as upon an actual total loss, after deducting from the amount of the loss any proceeds of the insured subject matter which have come to the hands of the insured.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1986.

If an insured omits to abandon, he may nevertheless recover his actual loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1987.

(a) A valuation fraudulent in fact entitles a marine insurer to rescind the contract.

(b) When the subject matter has been hypothecated by bottomry or respondentia, before its insurance and without the knowledge of the person actually procuring the insurance, such person may show the real value.

(c) Otherwise a valuation in a policy of marine insurance is conclusive between the parties in the adjustment of either a partial or total loss if the insured has some interest at risk and there is no fraud on his
 part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1988.

In a case of partial loss, a marine insurer is liable only for such proportion of the amount insured by him as the loss bears to the value of the whole interest of the insured in the subject matter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1989.

Where profits are separately insured in marine insurance, in case of loss the insured is entitled to recover that proportion of such profits which the value of the subject matter lost bears to the value of the whole.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1990.

In case of a valued policy of marine insurance on freightage or cargo, if only a part of the subject matter is exposed to risk, the valuation applies only in proportion to such part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1991.

When profits are valued and insured by marine insurance, a loss of them is conclusively presumed from a loss of the property out of which they were expected to arise, and the valuation fixes their amount.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1992.

In estimating a loss under an open policy of marine insurance, the following rules are to be observed:

(a) The value of a ship is its value at the beginning of the risk, including all articles or charges which add to its permanent value or which are necessary to prepare it for the voyage insured.

(b) The value of cargo is either its actual cost to the insured, when laden on board, or, where that cost can not be ascertained, its market value at the time and place of lading, adding the charges incurred in purchasing and placing it on board, but
 without reference to:

(1) Any losses incurred in raising money for its purchase.

(2) Any drawback on its exportation.

(3) The fluctuations of the market at the port of destination.

(4) Expenses incurred on the way or on arrival.

(c) The value of freightage is the gross freightage, exclusive of primage, without reference to the cost of earning it.

(d) The cost of insurance is in each case to be added to the value thus estimated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1993.

If cargo insured against partial loss arrives at the port of destination in a damaged condition, the loss of the insured is computed as follows:

(a) Deduct the market price, at port of destination, of the damaged subject matter from its market price there when sound.

(b) Take that proportion of the value which the remainder thus ascertained bears to such market price when sound.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1994.

A marine insurer is liable for all the expense attendant upon a loss which forces the ship into port to be repaired. Where it is agreed that the insured may labor for the recovery of the property, the insurer is liable for the expense incurred thereby. In either case, the liability for such expense is in addition to the liability for a subsequent total loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1995.

In marine insurance, when an insured is required to make a contribution in respect to the subject matter of insurance toward a general average loss, if the average was called for on a loss by a peril insured against, the insurer is liable for the insured’s loss through the contribution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1996.

In marine insurance, where an insured has a demand against others for contribution, he may claim the whole loss from the insurer, subrogating the insurer to the insured’s right to contribution. But no such claim can be made upon the insurer after the separation of the interests liable to contribution, nor after the insured, having the right and opportunity to enforce contribution from others, neglects or waives the exercise of that right.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1997.

In the case of a partial loss of a ship or its equipments, the old materials are to be applied towards payment for the new. Whether the ship is new or old, a marine insurer is liable for only two-thirds of the remaining cost of the repairs after such deduction, except that anchors and cannon must be paid for in full, and sheathing metal at a depreciation of only two and one-half per cent for each month that it has been fastened to the ship.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Exemptions [2010. - 2010.]

2010.

The provisions of Sections 481, 800, 801, 802, 803, and 804 shall not apply to ocean marine insurance as defined in Section 481.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 404.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Fire Insurance Contract [2030. - 2097.]



  ARTICLE 1. Change of Risk [2030. - 2033.]

2030.

An insurer is entitled to rescind a contract of fire insurance upon an alteration in the use or condition of the subject matter insured from that to which it is limited by the policy, when such alteration is made without the consent of the insurer by means within the control of the insured, and increases the risk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

2031.

When a contract of fire insurance does not restrict use or condition of insured subject matter, such contract is not affected by an alteration in such use or condition if the alteration does not increase the risk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

2032.

After the execution of a contract of fire insurance, an act of the insured does not affect the contract unless the act violates policy provisions, even though such act increases the risk and causes a loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

2033.

(a) The California Safe Homes grant program is hereby established to be developed and administered by the department for the purpose of achieving the following goals:

(1) Reducing local and statewide wildfire losses.

(2) Improving insurability and resilience of vulnerable communities.

(3) Home hardening of insurable properties to mitigate wildfire risk and enable consumers to get access to insurance premium incentives offered by insurance companies and in alignment with the department’s rules.

(b) (1) The Sustainable Insurance Account is hereby established
 within the Insurance Fund. Funds in the Sustainable Insurance Account shall be available to the department for the program upon appropriation by the Legislature, upon receipt of federal grants or funds, or upon receipt of other sources of grants or funds.

(2) Special funds in the Sustainable Insurance Account shall not be redistributed. Funds shall be used to support activities necessary to carry out the functions and purposes of the program.

(c) The department may adopt rules and establish eligibility requirements and additional procedures as necessary for the effective administration of the program and in accordance with any conditions associated with grants or funds received by the program. The department may contract with a third party to assist with program administration.

(d) When awarding grant funds under the program, the department shall prioritize the following, in descending order:

(1) The replacement of roofs to align with the standards specified in the department’s Safer from Wildfires regulations (Section 2644.9 of Title 10 of California Code of Regulations).

(2) The creation of a five-foot noncombustible zone around the structure, to align with the standards specified in the department’s Safer from Wildfires regulations (Section 2644.9 of Title 10 of California Code of Regulations).

(3) Projects that improve communitywide mitigation to reduce the risk of losses caused by wildfires, with consideration of all of the following priorities:

(A) Collective actions that mitigate risks before a disaster occurs by addressing risk factors on structures and in the surrounding area that exacerbate insurable wildfire losses.

(B) Alignment with existing risk mitigations identified in Section 2644.4.5 or 2644.9 of Title 10 of California Code of Regulations.

(C) Anticipated benefit to insurance policyholders.

(e) Eligible program applicants shall be qualifying individuals and qualifying cities, counties, and special districts, as follows:

(1) For a qualifying individual, grant funds related to incentives specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (d) may be awarded if the following criteria are met:

(A) The property of the applicant is covered by an admitted insurer or the California FAIR Plan Association.

(B) The property of the applicant is in a ZIP Code that overlaps with a high or very high fire hazard severity zone, as shown on current maps
 published by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(C) The income of the applicant is no higher than the low-income limit for the county in which they reside, as designated by the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(2) For a qualifying city, county, or special district, the applicant shall demonstrate the alignment of the use of grant funds to enhance and expand the priorities stated in subdivision (d) and the criteria for tracking performance.

(f) The department shall collect information to account for the performance of the program over time, including both of the following:

(1) The department shall require that grantees provide subsequent
 information on the use of grant funds, including receipt for contractor services, if appropriate, written attestation of work done by the recipient, and documentation that demonstrates if the grantee qualified for wildfire incentives from their insurance company after the grant funds were used to reduce wildfire risk of loss to the home.

(2) Regional information on the geographic distribution of grant funding.

(g) The California FAIR Plan Association shall submit an annual report to the department stating the number of policyholders that have qualified for each of the wildfire mitigation rating factors specified in the department’s Safer from Wildfires regulations (Section 2644.9 of Title 10 of California Code of Regulations).

(h) On or before January 1, 2027, and every two years thereafter, the department shall publish a performance report using aggregate information collected from grantees and metrics for the beneficial impacts of the grants awarded, including an accounting of the funding for each of the mitigation actions, geographic distributions, and present recommendations on how to improve the implementation of the program. The report shall be posted on the department’s internet website and submitted to the Legislature pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 536, Sec. 2.   (AB 888)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Measure of Indemnity [2050. - 2062.]

2050.

The effect of a valuation in a fire policy is the same as in a marine policy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

2051.

(a) Under an open policy, the measure of indemnity in fire insurance is the expense to the insured of replacing the thing lost or injured in its condition at the time of the injury, the expense being computed as of the time of the commencement of the fire.

(b) Under an open policy that requires payment of actual cash value, the measure of the actual cash value recovery, in whole or partial settlement of the claim, for either a total or partial loss to the structure or its contents, shall be the amount it would cost the insured to repair, rebuild, or replace the thing lost or injured less a fair and reasonable deduction for physical depreciation based upon
 its condition at the time of the injury or the policy limit, whichever is less. A deduction for physical depreciation shall apply only to components of a structure that are normally subject to repair and replacement during the useful life of that structure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 59, Sec. 1.   (AB 188)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2051.5.

(a) (1) Under an open policy that requires payment of the replacement cost for a loss, the measure of indemnity is the amount that it would cost the insured to repair, rebuild, or replace the thing lost or injured, without a deduction for physical depreciation, or the policy limit, whichever is less.

(2) If the policy requires the insured to repair, rebuild, or replace the damaged property in order to collect the full replacement cost, the insurer shall pay the actual cash value of the damaged property, as defined in Section 2051, until the damaged property is repaired, rebuilt, or replaced. Once the property is repaired, rebuilt, or replaced, the insurer shall pay
 the difference between the actual cash value payment made and the full replacement cost reasonably paid to replace the damaged property, up to the limits stated in the policy.

(b) (1) (A) A time limit of less than 12 months from the date that the first payment toward the actual cash value is made shall not be placed upon an insured in order to collect the full replacement cost of the loss, subject to the policy limit.

(B) In the event of a loss relating to a “state of emergency,” as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, a time limit of less than 36 months from the date that the first payment toward the actual cash value is made shall not be placed upon the insured in order to collect the full replacement cost of the loss, subject to the
 policy limit.

(C) This section does not prohibit an insurer from allowing the insured additional time to collect the full replacement cost.

(2) An insurer shall provide to a policyholder one or more additional extensions of six months for good cause pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) if the insured, acting in good faith and with reasonable diligence, encounters a delay or delays in approval for, or reconstruction of, the home or residence that are beyond the control of the insured. Circumstances beyond the control of the insured include, but are not limited to, unavoidable construction permit delays, the lack of necessary construction materials, or the unavailability of contractors to perform the necessary work.

(3) (A) In the event of a loss relating to a state of emergency, as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, an insurer shall not require the insured to provide proof of loss less than 100 days after the loss.

(B) The insurer shall provide to the insured one or more additional extensions of three months for submission of proof of loss for good cause if the insured, acting in good faith and with reasonable diligence, encounters a delay in providing proof of loss that is beyond the control of the insured. Circumstances beyond the control of the insured may include, but are not limited to, any of the following, where applicable to the specific claim:

(i) Delays by the insurer in acknowledging the claim or providing the claimant
 necessary forms, instructions, and reasonable assistance, including, but not limited to, specifying the information the claimant must provide for proof of loss.

(ii) For personal property coverage, the fact that a personal property inventory is premature if the primary structure has not yet commenced construction.

(iii) The unavailability of contractors to either perform the necessary work or create an estimate to rebuild, repair, or replace.

(iv) The disability, injury, or incapacity of the insured.

(v) The inability of the insured to access the insured property as a result of governmental action or because the insured property is located in an area that is exposed
 to hazardous materials posing a health risk.

(c) (1) In the event of a total loss of the insured structure, a policy issued or delivered in this state shall not contain a provision that limits or denies, on the basis that the insured has decided to rebuild at a new location or to purchase an already built home at a new location, payment of the building code upgrade cost or the replacement cost, including any extended replacement cost coverage, to the extent those costs are otherwise covered by the terms of the policy or any policy endorsement. However, the measure of indemnity shall not exceed the replacement cost, including the building code upgrade cost and any extended replacement cost coverage, if applicable, to repair, rebuild, or replace the insured structure at its original location.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, for a residential property insurance policy, the measure of damages available to a policyholder to use to rebuild or replace the insured home at another location shall be the amount that would have been recoverable had the insured dwelling been rebuilt at its original location, and a deduction for the value of land at the new location shall not be permitted from that measure of damages. However, the measure of indemnity shall not exceed the cost, including the building code upgrade cost and any extended replacement cost coverage, if applicable, to rebuild the insured structure at its original location.

(d) This section does not prohibit an insurer from restricting payment in cases of suspected fraud.

(e) On and after July 1, 2026, all policy forms issued or renewed by an insurer shall comply with this section in its entirety, including the changes made to this section by the act that added this paragraph.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 542, Sec. 2.   (SB 495)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2052.

Whenever the insured desires to have a valuation named in his policy insuring any building or structure against fire, he may require such building or structure to be examined by the insurer and the value of the insured’s interest therein shall be fixed at that time by the parties. The cost of the examination shall be paid by the insured.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

2053.

A clause shall be inserted in such a valued policy, stating substantially that the value of the insured’s interest in the insured building or structure has been thus fixed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

2054.

In the absence of any change increasing the risk without the consent of the insurer or of fraud on the part of the insured, and except as provided in Sections 2056 and 2058, the insurer under such a valued policy shall pay losses as follows:

(a) In case of a total loss, the whole amount insured upon the insured’s interest in such building or structure, as stated in the policy and upon which the insurers have received a premium. 

(b) In case of a partial loss the full amount of the partial loss. 

(c) In case there are two or more policies covering the insured’s interest, each policy shall contribute pro rata to the payment of such whole or partial loss.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 602, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

2055.

Except as provided by section 2056, the insurer shall not be required to pay more than the amount stated in such a valued policy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

2056.

Stipulations in a valued policy concerning the repairing, rebuilding or replacing of buildings or structures wholly or partially damaged or destroyed shall prevail over the provisions of sections 2054 and 2055.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

2057.

Under a contract of fire insurance, payment to the insured shall be made within 30 days after the amount of the loss and the liability of the company have been agreed upon or settled by the insured and the company in writing.

If the company fails to pay within the 30 days, the payment shall bear interest, beginning the 31st day, at the prevailing legal rate. The company also shall be liable for all costs of collection, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, if legal action is necessary to obtain payment after the company has willfully failed to pay within the 30 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1165.)
-------------------------------------------

2058.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a loss arising out of fire is rebuilt or replaced, an insured covered by a valued policy shall receive full payment for the loss up to the face amount of the policy. If the loss is not rebuilt or replaced, an insured covered by a valued policy shall receive either the replacement value of the loss or the face amount of the policy, whichever is less. As used in this section, “valued policy” has the meaning set forth in Section 412.

This section applies only to valued policies issued or renewed on and after July 1, 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 602, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2060.

(a) In the event of a loss under a homeowners’ insurance policy for which the insured has made a claim for additional living expenses, the insurer shall provide the insured with a list of items that the insurer believes may be covered under the policy as additional living expenses. The list may include a statement that the list is not intended to include all items covered under the policy, but only those that are commonly claimed, if this is the case. If the department develops a list for use by insurers, the insurer may use that list.

(b) (1) In the event of a covered loss relating to a state of emergency, as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, coverage for additional living expenses shall be